Utah statutes.
58-16a-701.    Form of practice.

(1)  An optometrist licensed under this chapter may engage in practice as an optometrist or in the practice of optometry only as an individual licensee.  However, as an individual licensee he may be:

(a)  an individual operating as a business proprietor;

(b)  an employee of another person or corporation;

(c)  a partner in a lawfully organized partnership;

(d)  a lawfully formed professional corporation;

(e)  a lawfully organized limited liability company;

(f)  a lawfully organized business corporation; or

(g)  any other form of organization recognized by the state and which is not prohibited by division rule made in collaboration with the board.

(2)  Regardless of the form in which a licensee engages in the practice of optometry, the licensee may only permit the practice of optometry in that form of practice to be conducted by an individual:

(a)  licensed in Utah as an optometrist under Section 58-16a-301; and

(b)  who is able to lawfully and competently engage in the practice of optometry.



Enacted by Chapter 13, 1997 General Session

